Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB230.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1342(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1342. Veteran plates and placard.(a) Severely disabled veteran plate.--(1) On the application of a veteran whose service-connected disability is certified at 100% by the service unit of the armed forces in which the veteran served or by the United States Veterans' Administration or who has a service-connected disability of the type enumerated in section 1338 (relating to person with disability plate and placard), the department shall issue a special registration plate designating the vehicle as belonging to a severely disabled veteran. The registration plate shall have a white 123456789101112131415161718 background, shall have blue numbers or letters as the department may determine, shall have the words "disabled veteran" in at least ten-point bold type inscribed in red at the bottom of the plate and shall include the international symbol for access for persons with disabilities. A special registration plate issued to a veteran under this [section] subsection may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds. In the case of a motorcycle, the department shall issue a decal containing the international symbol for access for persons with disabilities and the words "disabled veteran" for display on the registration plate.(2) The department shall provide, at no additional cost, the option for a veteran to whom a special registration plate or decal is issued under this subsection to a vehicle or motorcycle, as applicable, to request a second special registration plate or decal under this subsection to be affixed to the front of the same vehicle or motorcycle.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0230PN0183 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920